Illinois, session 104th, HB5688.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $59,116,600, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 7Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of Western Illinois 8University to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal 9year ending June 30, 2027. 10    Section 10. The sum of $10,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the State College and 12University Trust Fund to the Board of Trustees of Western 13Illinois University for scholarship grant awards from the sale 14of collegiate license plates. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162026.